Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
STATE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM

23-3.6-201 to 23-3.6-205. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part repealed, (HB 09-1111), ch. 396, p. 2141, § 3, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added in 2007 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2009. For the text of this part 2 prior to 2009, consult the 2008 Colorado Revised Statutes. The provisions of this part 2 were relocated to part 7 of article 20.5 of title 25. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following those sections that were relocated to part 7.